California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
If a purchaser fails to comply with any of the terms of their contract of purchase, the department may cancel the contract, and be released from all obligations, at law or in equity, to convey the property, and the purchaser shall forfeit all right thereto. All payments previously made shall be deemed to be rental paid for occupancy. Upon forfeiture, the department shall take possession of the property covered by the contract, and shall remove all persons and personal property therefrom without any liability on the part of the department or of any official or employee thereof for any damage or injury caused by or incident to the entry or removal. The failure of the department to exercise any option to cancel or to exercise any other privilege under
 the contract for any default shall not constitute a waiver of the right to exercise the option or privilege for any other default on the part of the purchaser. The department shall allow a stock cooperative, as defined in Section 4190 of the Civil Code, the opportunity to cure any failure by a purchaser described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 79.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

987.775.

Whenever the department proceeds under Section 987.77 to declare a forfeiture and to retain all payments made under the forfeited contract as rental paid for occupancy, the department may, in lieu of paying any net gain to the purchaser in accordance with Section 987.79, deposit that net gain into a segregated account in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 created to receive funds pursuant to this section. The funds in the account shall be accumulated until June 30 of each year, and any losses on the sales of forfeited properties during the fiscal
 year shall be deducted from the total of the net gains deposited in the account during the fiscal year. The department may expend the funds remaining in the account on June 30 each year, after deduction for losses on sales of forfeited properties, for purposes of assistance to lower income purchasers pursuant to subdivision (c), (e), or (h) of Section 987.71.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 441, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

987.78.

(a) In the event of a forfeiture of a contract of purchase under this article, the department may sell or otherwise dispose of the property covered by the forfeited contract to any person and upon any terms and conditions as it determines to be proper, under the conditions set forth in this section.

(b) The department shall give first preference to a veteran who qualifies under this article and who served during a time of war, second preference to any other person serving in
 or honorably discharged from the armed forces of the United States, third preference to any person who is a first-time home buyer, and fourth preference to any other person.

(c) Where the department elects in the event of a forfeiture to sell or otherwise dispose of an assignment of an Indian veteran’s beneficial interest or of a leasehold interest in allotment trust land, the department shall first offer it for sale to the person or persons for whom the land is held in trust, including an Indian veteran having a beneficial interest in the trust land on which the forfeiture occurred, at a price equal to the unpaid balance of the contract price. If none of the persons for whom the land is held in trust accepts the offer, the department shall next offer it to the United States Secretary of the Interior at the same price.

(d) Where the department elects in the event of forfeiture to
 sell or otherwise dispose of a leasehold interest in tribal trust land, the department shall first offer it for sale to the tribe for whom the land is held in trust at a price equal to the unpaid balance of the contract price. If the tribe fails to accept the offer, the department shall next offer it to the United States Secretary of the Interior at the same price.

(e) Where all the parties to whom the department is required to offer the property under subdivision (c) or (d) fail to accept the offer, the department may sell or otherwise dispose of the property covered by the forfeited contract as provided by subdivision (a) and, in so doing, the department shall give first preference to any good faith offer by a person approved by the tribal council of the reservation, rancheria, or land held under the jurisdiction of that particular tribal governing body on which the allotment land is sited.

(f) If the property is subject to a participation contract, the department may, at its option, pay the balance due upon the participation contract, including accrued interest, without penalty.

(g) Nothing in this section invalidates a transfer to, or affects the interest of, a good faith purchaser for value without notice of any failure of the department to comply with any requirement of this section in the disposition of any property subject to a forfeited contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 156, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

987.785.

Except as set forth in regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 987.93 with respect to a cooperative dwelling unit, whenever the department cancels a contract and takes possession of a property pursuant to Section 987.77 and elects to sell the property covered by a forfeited contract, the department may, at its option, establish a procedure for listing the property for sale, together with similarly located
 properties, with a licensed real estate broker. The department may, in this connection, prepare schedules of properties available for sale by geographic areas and may offer a schedule from time to time to any licensed real estate broker within the geographic area covered by the schedule for a fee which shall be sufficient to cover the costs to the department in compiling the schedules and making them available. If the department enters into a real estate listing agreement, exclusive or otherwise, with a licensed real estate broker, the department shall cooperate with the broker in all customary respects and make the property available at reasonable times for inspections by prospective purchasers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 396, Sec. 7.   (AB 1224)   Effective September 20, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

987.79.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), the department may, in the contract of purchase with a veteran, provide that, in the event of default by the veteran and forfeiture of their rights under the contract and subsequent sale of the property by the department, it may pay to the veteran any net gain realized by the department upon the sale. The department is the sole judge of the net gain.

(b) The net gain realized by the department upon the sale of a cooperative dwelling unit owned by a limited equity housing cooperative shall be determined in accordance with regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 987.93.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 80.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

987.80.

(a) The department may insure and keep insured against fire or other hazards all buildings, fences, other permanent improvements, or crops situated upon any property which has reverted to and is under the control of the department, or may do the work and supply the materials necessary to keep the buildings, fences, and other improvements situated upon the property in good order and repair. The department may lease or let the property, in whole or in part, upon any terms that the department determines to be proper. In the case of a farm, the department may cultivate the farm or harvest the crop.

(b) Whenever the department determines to lease or let any reverted property pursuant to subdivision (a), the department may give first priority to public or private organizations serving homeless veterans if the property is zoned for that use and all state and local building permit and use conditions are met. The department may give second priority to a public housing authority organized pursuant to the Housing Authorities Law (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 34200) of Part 2 of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code) for leasing or letting to persons of low income, as defined in Section 34213 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 563, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

987.81.

If illness or accident prevents a purchaser of a farm from cultivating his farm or harvesting any crop, the department may enter and cultivate the farm or harvest the crop. In such event the department has a first lien upon the crop for all moneys expended and may sell the harvested crop. Out of the proceeds of the sale the department may reimburse itself for any expense which it has incurred in the cultivation of the farm, the harvesting of crops and the sale thereof, and retain any moneys due to the department from the purchaser. Any balance shall be paid by the department to the purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1477.)
-------------------------------------------

987.82.

When a purchaser dies, indebted to the department under contract of purchase, his rights acquired under this article and such contract shall devolve upon his heirs, devisees, or personal representatives, but subject to all rights, claims, and charges of the department. Default on the part of an heir, devisee, or personal representative, with respect to any right, claim, or charge of the department shall have the same effect as would default on the part of the purchaser but for his death.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1477.)
-------------------------------------------

987.83.

For the purposes of carrying out the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 the Director of Finance may by executive order authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article, and the amount necessary to carry out this section is hereby appropriated without regard to fiscal years. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1974. Any moneys made available under this section to the department shall be returned to the General Fund in such amounts as may be received by the department
 from the sale of bonds sold for the purpose of carrying out this article, together with interest at the rate of interest fixed in the bonds so sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1477.)
-------------------------------------------

987.84.

Except as may otherwise be permitted by the department pursuant to regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 987.93, the right to declare a forfeiture for breach of a condition contained in any deed to real property or in any cooperative dwelling unit ownership documents may not be enforced as against the interest of the department in said property or any portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 396, Sec. 9.   (AB 1224)   Effective September 20, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

987.85.

(a) The department shall not acquire a home in which the veteran has an interest of record except in the following instances:

(1) Where the application is for aid for the construction of a home upon real property owned by the applicant and the improvements to be constructed thereon have not reached completion as evidenced by the issuance of a certificate of occupancy.

(2) Where the veteran had no interest of record in the property at the time of filing their application and thereafter secured interim financing pending the processing and approval of the application by the department.

(3) Where the application is for the purchase of a
 mobilehome to be situated upon real property, or an undivided interest therein, owned by the applicant.

(4) Where the applicant is an Indian veteran and the application is for the construction of a dwelling house or other improvements on, or for the purchase of a mobilehome to be sited on, trust land in which the Indian veteran has a beneficial interest or owns an interest of record.

(5) Where the application is for assistance to enable the veteran to purchase their space, or share in a mobilehome park, which is converted from a rental park to a nonprofit corporate resident-owned park or subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes, in which the veteran resides in their mobilehome. A veteran applying for assistance under this subdivision shall not be required to have their mobilehome reinstalled on a permanent foundation system as a condition of receiving the proceeds
 of the loan to purchase their space or share of the park. This subdivision shall be implemented by the department only to the extent that expenditures for the kind of financial assistance to veterans enumerated herein conform to the requirements of federal tax law with regard to the tax-exempt status of funding instruments utilized to provide the assistance.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department may acquire a home for the purpose of refinancing an existing mortgage loan that is not a mortgage loan acquired under the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974, known as the CalVet Home Loan Program.

The certain funds used by the department for the purposes described in this subdivision shall be used in accordance with federal laws and regulations governing the use of qualified mortgage bonds and qualified veterans’ mortgage bonds.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the department may, for the sole purpose of stabilizing or preserving the CalVet Home Loan Program portfolio, refinance existing CalVet Home Loan Program mortgage loans, provided both of the following apply:

(A) The department did not solicit the veteran borrower solely for the purpose of refinancing their loan except in response to clear evidence the borrower was seeking that refinancing and would resort to paying in full their loan through the CalVet Home Loan Program through a third-party lender.

(B) For loans ensured by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the prospective refinanced loan meets all requirements of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs regarding refinanced loans.

(2) The certain funds used
 by the department for the purposes described in this subdivision shall be used in accordance with federal laws and regulations governing the use of those funds, including, but not limited to, the use of qualified mortgage bonds and qualified veterans’ mortgage bonds.

(d) The department shall, consistent with the purposes of this article, adopt and publish rules and regulations that are necessary to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 549, Sec. 16.   (SB 661)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

987.86.

(a) Any veteran for whom a farm or home is purchased under this article may be granted a subsequent opportunity to purchase another farm or home when the farm or home purchased under this article is sold, refinanced, or the veteran’s interest is divested through divorce or dissolution of marriage. The maximum amount that the department may advance under this subdivision is limited to the maximum amounts set forth in Section 987.65 at the time the application is made for the subsequent loan.

(b) Only one farm or home purchased under this article shall be owned by a veteran or a veteran and the veteran’s spouse at any one time. This subdivision does not apply to an interest of a former spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 156, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

987.87.

(a) The department shall establish the actual interest rate to be paid. To this end, the department, within 60 days of receipt of the survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases required at the close of each fiscal year conducted by an independent public accounting firm of recognized standing as provided under various veterans bond acts, shall report to the California Veterans Board and the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, regarding the recommended uniform rate of interest payable upon the amount
 remaining unpaid under any veteran’s purchase contract executed on or after September 26, 1974. The department shall make its finding as to the rate of interest to be charged, determined by a floating rate based upon the actual cost of general obligation bond and revenue bond sales, plus a certain percent for administrative costs, taking into consideration the current value of money, the solvency of the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, and the interest paid on any participation contracts to which the interest of the department may be subject. Upon approval by the board and the committee, the department may raise or lower the effective rate of interest payable under these contracts annually as it deems to be for the best interests of the department, as well as the contractholders, if in so doing this action is made applicable alike to any and all of these contracts. The interest rate shall not be raised so that the effective date of a higher rate of interest occurs more than once in any calendar
 year, unless the board and committee, by a two-thirds vote of the members of each, make a finding that an additional increase in the interest rate is necessary to enable the department to maintain the financial solvency of the fund or to meet its obligations to bondholders or purchasers. At least 90 days’ advance written notice to the contractholders shall be given before any increase in the interest rate becomes effective.

(b) The total amount of any installment payment shall be raised or lowered to reflect any change in the effective rate of interest. The department may, however, adjust or postpone any installment payment for good cause pursuant to Section 987.71 and, for these purposes, good cause shall include a consideration of whether an increased installment payment would be excessively burdensome in light of a purchaser’s financial circumstances. The department shall include notice of this provision in the 90 days’ advance notice
 required under subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and Section 987.875, the department may establish separate rates of interest payable on the amounts remaining unpaid under veterans’ purchase contracts for any and all contractholders who are called to active duty in the military service of the United States, and who qualify for relief under the provisions of the federal Soldier’s and Sailor’s Civil Relief Act of 1940, as amended. The rates need not be uniform for all who qualify, but shall not be greater than the rate provided for in that act. Rates shall be established at the discretion of the department, and may apply to any contract from the date of entry into active duty to, and including, 90 days after the date of release from active duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 473, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

987.875.

Notwithstanding Section 987.87 or any other provision of law, the department shall report to the California Veterans Board and the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, regarding the recommended rate of interest payable upon the amount remaining unpaid under any veteran’s purchase contract executed on or after January 1, 1999. The department, from time to time, shall establish and may modify, subject to the approval of the board and the committee, the actual rates to be paid, which may be fixed interest rates or variable interest rates, or the methodology and
 timing for determining or modifying the actual interest rates to be paid, which methodology may produce fixed interest rates or variable interest rates on purchase contracts executed on or after January 1, 1999. The interest rates need not be uniform for all the purchase contracts. The interest rates shall be determined by the department in accordance with guidelines established by the board and the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 362, Sec. 1.   Effective August 24, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

987.88.

(a) In the event the department enters into a master agreement with one or more insurance companies to provide life or disability insurance coverage for the purchasers of farms and homes from the department, the master agreement shall provide that the life insurance will be offered to purchasers who are disabled solely as a result of their qualifying military service and to nondisabled purchasers on an equal basis and that no purchaser shall be denied coverage solely because that purchaser has a qualifying military service-connected
 disability at the time of application. Notwithstanding Part 2 (commencing with Section 10110) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, the life or disability insurance shall be a form of group life or group disability insurance.

(b) The master agreement shall provide for maintenance of those reserves as the department, after consultation with the Insurance Commissioner, deems appropriate and prudent, and the department may use from time to time any accumulated surplus in those reserves, or any refunds or returns therefrom upon termination of the agreement, for the purposes of this article or of any veterans general obligation or revenue bond act. Any and all acts of the department in maintaining and using the reserves consistent with this subdivision are hereby ratified and confirmed, it having at all times been the intent of the Legislature that reserves be maintained and that any surpluses therein or refunds or returns therefrom be used by the
 department for the purposes stated in this subdivision.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), on and after January 1, 1987, any reserves maintained under the master agreement shall not exceed a level greater than 20 percent in excess of actuarial requirements plus a reasonable contingency reserve, as determined annually by the department, and the department may contract with one or more independent actuaries or actuarial firms to assist the department in the annual determination.

(d) Any departmental proposal to enter into, revise, amend, renew, extend, or cancel, any agreement described in this section shall be a policy change subject to subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 84.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.   Effective July 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

987.881.

The insurance company or companies may provide life and disability insurance pursuant to Section 987.88 by one or more separate accounts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1140, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

987.89.

The action of a veteran purchaser for damages against any third party does not affect his right of action for all damages against any party other than the department. If the department indemnifies, or becomes obligated to indemnify, the veteran purchaser, it may likewise bring an action against any such third party responsible for damage to the contract property. In the latter event, the department may recover in the same suit all payments made on behalf of the veteran purchaser.

If either the veteran purchaser or the department brings an action against such third party, the veteran purchaser or the department, as the case may be,
 shall forthwith give to the other written notice of the action and of the name of the court in which the action is brought, by personal service or registered mail. Proof of such service shall be filed in such action. If the action is brought by either the veteran purchaser or the department, the other may, at any time before trial on the facts, join as party plaintiff, or shall consolidate the action if brought independently.

The court shall first apply, out of the entire amount of any judgment for any damage recovered by the veteran purchaser, a sufficient amount to reimburse the department for the amount of its expenditures for indemnification. If the department has not joined in the action or has not brought action, or if the action has not been consolidated, the court, on the department’s application, shall allow as a first lien against the entire amount of any judgment for any damages recovered by the veteran purchaser, the amount of the department’s
 expenditures for indemnification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1477.)
-------------------------------------------

987.90.

For the purposes of carrying out the provisions of the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974, there is hereby appropriated, and the department is hereby authorized to utilize the proceeds derived from the Veterans Bond Act of 1974, and from all veterans bond acts subsequent thereto, and to combine such funds up to a percent to be established by the Veterans Finance Committee and reported to the Legislature annually, with funds derived from participation contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

987.91.

Pursuant to the provisions of Section 987.90, the Department of Veterans Affairs is authorized to issue to lenders or investors supplying funds for the program a participation contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1477.)
-------------------------------------------

987.92.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this article relating to maximum sums to be expended by the department and maximum purchase price, the department may acquire or construct a home equipped with solar energy heating devices at a purchase price not in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) over the maximum amounts specified in Sections 987.60, 987.61, and 987.65. Solar energy heating devices for swimming pools, hot tubs, saunas, and spas shall not qualify for any expenditure pursuant to this section except in the case of veterans who were wounded or disabled as a result of their service and who provide medical evidence satisfactory to the department
 that a heated swimming pool, hot tub, sauna, or spa, is therapeutically necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

987.93.

Where the property consists of a cooperative dwelling unit:

(a) The purchaser’s right to occupy the property under its contract with the department shall not be subject to consent or approval by the stock cooperative, as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 1351 of the Civil Code, nor shall there be any fee or surcharge imposed by the stock cooperative as a
 result of the right of occupancy, provided that the foregoing shall not affect the rights that the stock cooperative may have under the applicable cooperative dwelling unit ownership documents to approve the initial acquisition of the cooperative dwelling unit by the department on behalf of the purchaser.

(b) As a condition to taking title to a cooperative dwelling unit, the department shall require that the stock cooperative enter into an agreement directly with the department, which agreement shall be in a form established by the department and shall provide for such matters as the department may determine relating to (1) the enforcement by the stock cooperative of its rights in the event that the purchaser defaults under the cooperative dwelling unit ownership documents, (2) the enforcement by the department of its rights in the event the purchaser defaults under its contract with the department, and (3) such other matters as the department
 may determine to be necessary to reasonably protect its interest in the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 377, Sec. 12.   (AB 1084)   Effective September 30, 2011.   See same-numbered section added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 396.)
-------------------------------------------

987.93.

The department may adopt regulations necessary to implement this article for cooperative dwelling units that are consistent with the objectives and purposes of this article and in a manner in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 396, Sec. 10.   (AB 1224)   Effective September 20, 2012.   See same-numbered section added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 377.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.2. The Veterans Housing and Homeless Prevention Act of 2014 [987.001. - 987.011.]

987.001.

This article may be cited as the Veterans Housing and Homeless Prevention Act of 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 3.   (AB 639)   Effective October 10, 2013.   Note: Sections 987.01 through 987.31 are located in Article 3; Sections 987.50 through 987.93 are located in Article 3.1.)
-------------------------------------------

987.002.

(a) The purpose of this article is to provide the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, and preservation of affordable multifamily supportive housing, affordable transitional housing, affordable rental housing, or related facilities for veterans and their families to allow veterans to access and maintain housing stability.

(b) A program established under this article shall be restricted to
 veterans and their families.

(c) The California Housing Finance Agency, the Department of Housing and Community Development, and the Department of Veterans Affairs, herein after “departments,” shall work collaboratively pursuant to the memorandum of understanding, as specified in Section 987.006, to carry out the duties and functions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 3.   (AB 639)   Effective October 10, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

987.003.

As used in this article:

(a) “Affordable rental housing” shall mean a rental housing development, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 50675.2 of the Health and Safety Code, with affordable rents, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 50675.2 of the Health and Safety Code, but neither definition is restrictive to only projects with five or more units.

(b) “Extremely low income” has the same meaning as defined in Section 50106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) “Homeless” has the same meaning as defined in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that section read on January 10, 2019.

(d) “Qualified entity” means an entity that is responsible for making referrals of qualified tenants to qualified units.

(e) “Qualified tenant” means an extremely low income veteran who is homeless.

(f) “Qualified unit” means a supportive housing unit restricted to extremely low income veterans pursuant to this article.

(g) “Secondary tenants” means a veteran who is homeless and has an income of up to 60 percent of the area median income.

(h) “Supportive housing” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 50675.2 of the Health and Safety Code, but is not restrictive to only projects with five or more units.

(i) “Transitional housing” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision
 (i) of Section 50675.2 of the Health and Safety Code, but is not restrictive to only projects with five or more units.

(j) “Veteran” means any person who served in the active military, naval, or air service of the United States, or as a member of the National Guard who was called to and released from active duty or active service, for a period of not less than 90 consecutive days or was discharged from the service due to a service-connected disability within that 90-day period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 918, Sec. 1.   (AB 535)   Effective September 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

987.004.

The administration of this article is vested solely in the departments. Total costs of administering this article shall not exceed 5 percent of the bond funds issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 3.   (AB 639)   Effective October 10, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

987.005.

(a) The departments shall establish and implement programs pursuant to the purposes of this article that focus on veterans at risk for homelessness or experiencing temporary or chronic homelessness. To the extent feasible, the departments shall establish and implement programs that, among other things, do the following:

(1) Leverage public (federal, state, and local), private, and nonprofit program and fiscal resources.

(2) Ensure projects combine housing and supportive services, including, but not limited to, job training, mental health and drug treatment, case management, care coordination, or physical rehabilitation.

(3) Promote
 public and private partnerships.

(4) Foster innovative financing opportunities.

(5) Ensure program guidelines and terms provide threshold requirements to advance applicants with experience in combining permanent or transitional housing, or both, with supportive services for veterans, or for partnering with housing developers or service providers with experience offering housing or services to veterans.

(b) (1) The departments shall ensure at least 50 percent of funds awarded for capital development under this article provide housing to veteran households with extremely low incomes.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (5) and subdivision (h), in determining whether a potential tenant is eligible for supportive, affordable, or
 transitional housing targeted to extremely low income households under this provision, eligibility shall take into consideration all of a household’s income sources upon initial tenancy.

(3) At least 60 percent of units funded targeting extremely low income households shall be supportive housing.

(4) This section shall not deter the departments from funding projects serving mixed-income populations.

(5) (A) A qualified entity tasked with making referrals to qualified units targeted to extremely low income households may submit a petition to the departments pursuant to subdivision (c) for the purposes of requesting authority to lease the qualified unit to secondary tenants if the qualified entity is unable to locate, match, or otherwise place a qualified tenant in a qualified unit within 60 days
 of the unit becoming available. The qualified entity may submit an application to the departments 30 days after the unit becoming available for occupancy, provided that the unit is vacant for at least 60 days at the time the departments approve the petition. The departments may not approve a petition if it would result in any changes other than tenant income eligibility criteria, as described in this section, that may impact the project’s regulatory agreement.

(B) This shall include circumstances in which approving a petition for a qualified entity to house tenants with incomes up to 60 percent of the area median income would cause a supported development to have less than 50 percent of its units occupied by tenants with extremely low incomes. The supported development shall not have less than 30 percent of its units occupied by tenants with extremely low incomes.

(C) If a
 qualified unit that is restricted to a qualified tenant with an extremely low income is occupied by a secondary tenant or other tenant who is a veteran experiencing homelessness with an income between 30 and 60 percent of area median income pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), that unit shall be redesignated to an area median income level commensurate with the income level of the secondary tenant and the secondary tenant shall pay rent commensurate with their household income’s percentage of the area median income.

(D) Beginning 12 months after the petition has been approved, if a qualified unit that is restricted to a qualified tenant with an extremely low income is occupied by a secondary tenant or other tenant who is a veteran experiencing homelessness with an income between 30 and 60 percent of area median income pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), the next available comparable unit shall then be rented to a qualified tenant at 30 percent
 of the area median income with the goal of returning the project into compliance with the unit mix required by the project regulatory agreement.

(6) The qualified entity tasked with making referrals to these units shall make a good faith effort to match a tenant with an extremely low income before submitting a petition to the departments, document these good faith efforts, submit this documentation as part of the petition, and make this documentation available to the housing sponsor, who shall include the documentation in the tenant file, and, upon request, to the departments. Documentation of these good faith efforts shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) Efforts to advertise to the community at least 90 days prior to the lease-up of the building.

(B) Efforts to work in partnership with local
 homeless services providers, including those that serve veterans experiencing homelessness.

(C) Efforts to coordinate with the local continuum of care to identify veterans experiencing homelessness with extremely low incomes.

(D) Efforts to coordinate with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to identify veterans experiencing homelessness with extremely low incomes.

(E) Documentation of contact with veterans experiencing homelessness with extremely low incomes and their case managers who were matched to the available unit and chose not to lease the unit.

(c) The departments shall create a standardized form for the submission of petitions described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b).

(1) Upon receiving a petition pursuant to this section, the departments shall do both of the following:

(A) Review the petition and decide if the qualified unit is eligible to accept secondary tenants under all applicable guidelines, rules, and regulations, and other laws established by the Internal Revenue Service and the departments.

(B) Provide a written determination approving or denying the petition. The written determination shall be provided to the qualified entity as soon as possible, but no later than 30 days after the departments receive the petition.

(2) If necessary, the departments may create written rules for the review of and determination on the petitions that are consistent with the requirements of this section, including, but not limited to, additional rules related to projects seeking
 approval before permanent loan conversion.

(d) The departments may review, adopt, amend, and repeal guidelines or terms, or both, to implement this article. Any guidelines or terms adopted to implement this article shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) Nothing in this article permits the departments or the board to purchase, operate, or manage properties except in the event of a foreclosure on a borrower or grantee.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a housing developer or service provider that provides housing or services pursuant to this article may provide housing or services to female veterans and their children in women-only facilities in limited instances in which a female veteran (A) has
 suffered any form of sexual abuse, trauma, or intimidation or harassment while serving in the military and is seeking treatment for that sexual abuse, trauma, or intimidation or harassment, or (B) is seeking the housing or services as a result of being a victim of sexual abuse or domestic violence.
